Massachusetts, session 194th, H649.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 159 the following section:-
Section 159A. There shall be a permanent commission on American Indian and Alaska
Native education, which shall consist of 17 persons as follows: 1 person appointed by
Department of Early Education and Care, 1 person appointed by Department of Elementary and
Secondary Education, 1 person appointed by Department of Higher Education, 2 persons
appointed by Department of Public Health, 1 person appointed by Department of Mental Health,
1 person appointed by Department of Youth Services, 1 person appointed by Department of
Veterans' Services, 1 person appointed by Division of Prevention and Wellness, 1 person
appointed by Interagency Council on Housing and Homelessness, 7 persons appointed by
Massachusetts Commission on Indian Affairs in consultation with tribal governments and
intertribal organizations. Members of the commission shall be drawn from diverse racial, ethnic,
of 4

religious, age, sexual-orientation and socio-economic backgrounds from throughout the
commonwealth. Members shall be considered special state employees for purposes of chapter
268A of the General Laws. The commission shall be an independent agency of the
commonwealth and shall not be subject to the control of any other department or agency.
Members shall serve terms of 2 years and until their successors are appointed. Vacancies
in the membership of the commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the
balance of the unexpired term. Appointments shall be made in consultation with tribal
governments and intertribal organizations. Nominations shall be solicited between August 1 and
November 1 of each year through an open application process using a uniform application that is
widely distributed throughout the state. The commission shall elect annually from among its
members a chair. The chair of the commission may designate on an annual basis 1 or more
commission members as vice-chairs of the commission, and may appoint on an annual basis
members of the commission as chairs of advisory committees on high school education, higher
education, human services and youth. The chair of the commission may create other advisory
committees as needed after consultation with the commission. The members of the commission
shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for any usual and
customary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
The commission shall investigate the use of resources from both the public and private
sectors to enhance and improve the ability of state agencies to provide educational opportunities
and improving educational outcomes for all American Indian and Alaska Native students in
order to further tribal self-determination and to help ensure that students have an opportunity to
learn their heritage languages and histories and to receive complete and competitive educations
that prepare them for college, careers, and productive satisfying lives. In furtherance of that
of 4

responsibility, the commission shall: (1) work in partnership with the department of education
and the department of public health to create school-based and community-based programs
focusing on suicide prevention, violence intervention, and the promotion of zero-tolerance
policies regarding harassment and discrimination against American Indians and Alaska Natives;
and (2) make recommendations about policies and programs supporting American Indians and
Alaska Natives on an ongoing basis to the department of education, the department of public
health and the executive office of health and human services. The commission shall annually, on
or before June 2, report the results of its findings and activities of the preceding year and make
recommendations relating to the concerns of American Indians and Alaska Natives to the
governor and to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives.
The powers of the commission shall include but not be limited to the following: (1) to use
voluntary and uncompensated services of private individuals, agencies and organizations that
may from time to time be offered and needed; (2) to recommend policies and make
recommendations to agencies and officers of the commonwealth and local subdivisions of
government to effectuate its purposes; (3) to select an executive director and to acquire adequate
staff to perform its duties, subject to appropriation; (4) to establish and maintain offices that it
considers necessary, subject to appropriation; (5) to enact by-laws for its own governance; (6) to
appoint members to regional chapters of the commission; and (7) to hold regular, public
meetings and to hold fact-finding hearings and other public forums as it may consider necessary.
The commission may request from all state agencies such information and assistance as
the commission may require. The commission may accept and solicit funds, including any gifts,
donations, grants or bequests or any federal funds, for any of the purposes of this section. These
funds shall be deposited in a separate account with the state treasurer, be received by the
of 4

treasurer on behalf of the commonwealth, and be expended by the commission in accordance
with law.
of 4